Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201916-714
City funds; depository bond; conditions.

For the security of the fund so deposited, the city treasurer of a city of the first class shall require each depository to give bond for the safekeeping and payment of such deposits and the accretions thereof, which bond shall run to the city and be approved by the mayor. Such bond shall be conditioned that such a depository shall, at the end of every quarter, render to the city treasurer a statement in duplicate, showing the several daily balances, the amount of money of the city held by it during the quarter, the amount of the accretion thereto, and how credited. The bond shall also be conditioned that the depository shall generally do and perform whatever may be required by the provisions of sections 16-712 to 16-715 and faithfully discharge the trust reposed in such depository. Such bond shall be as nearly as practicable in the form provided in section 77-2304. No person in any way connected with any depository as an officer or stockholder shall be accepted as a surety on any bond given by the depository of which he or she is an officer or stockholder. Such bond shall be deposited with the city clerk. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 86, p. 294;

R.S.1913, § 4982;

C.S.1922, § 4151;

C.S.1929, § 16-713;

Laws 1931, c. 28, § 1, p. 115;

Laws 1937, c. 22, § 1, p. 134;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 16-713;

R.S.1943, § 16-714;

Laws 1969, c. 84, § 5, p. 426;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 20;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 21;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 182;

Laws 2019, LB194, § 81.
September 1, 2019